Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-813
Taxes; warrant of city clerk; form.

To each tax list so delivered a warrant under the hand of the city clerk shall be annexed, to be substantially in the following form:

In the name and by the authority of the State of Nebraska: To ............... city treasurer of the city of ............... in Nebraska;

You are hereby commanded to collect from each of the persons and corporations named in the annexed tax list and owners of real estate described therein the taxes set down in such list opposite their respective names, and the several parcels of land described therein; and in case any person or corporation upon whom any such tax or sum is imposed, or who by law is required to pay the same, shall refuse or neglect to pay the full amount thereof before the first day of March (or September), 20.... (insert year after levy), you are to levy and collect the same by distress and sale of the goods and chattels of the person or corporation so taxed as are by law required to pay such tax.

Given under my hand and official seal this ............... day of ............... A.D. 20.... .

.......................................City Clerk of the City of ........... .

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 83, p. 101;

R.S.1913, § 4557;

C.S.1922, § 3944;

C.S.1929, § 15-815;

Laws 1933, c. 136, § 16, p. 526;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 15-815;

R.S.1943, § 15-813;

Laws 2004, LB 813, § 3.